Hawaii statutes.
§432:2-104 Fraternal benefit
societies. Any incorporated society, order or supreme lodge, without
capital stock, including one exempted under the provisions of section
432:2-704(a)(2) whether incorporated or not, conducted solely for the benefit
of its members and their beneficiaries and not for profit, operated on a lodge
system with ritualistic form of work, having a representative form of
government, and which provides benefits in accordance with this article, is
hereby declared to be a fraternal benefit society. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next